hu: VCR-konfiguráció: DVD/VCR kombó; Önálló VCR; VCR digitális tunerrel; Egyéb
nl: Videorecorder configuratie: DVD/VCR-combi; Losstaande VCR; VCR met digitale tuner; Andere
pt-BR: Configuração do videocassete: Combo DVD/VCR; VCR independente; VCR com sintonizador digital; Outro
fr: Configuration du magnétoscope: Combo DVD/magnétoscope; Magnétoscope autonome; Magnétoscope avec tuner numérique; Autre
fi: VCR-kokoonpano: DVD/VCR-yhdistelmä; Erillinen VCR; VCR digitaaliviritimellä; Muu
ja: VCR構成: DVD/VCRコンボ; スタンドアロンVCR; デジタルチューナー付きVCR; その他
nb: VCR-konfigurasjon: DVD/VCR-kombo; Frittstående VCR; VCR med digital tuner; Annet
en: VCR configuration: DVD/VCR combo; Standalone VCR; VCR with digital tuner; Other
el: Διαμόρφωση VCR: Συνδυασμός DVD/VCR; Αυτόνομο VCR; VCR με ψηφιακό δέκτη; Άλλο
bg-BG: Конфигурация на видеокасетофона: DVD/VCR комбо; Самостоятелен VCR; VCR с цифров тунер; Други
it: Configurazione VCR: Combo DVD/VCR; VCR standalone; VCR con sintonizzatore digitale; Altro
hr-HR: VCR konfiguracija: DVD/VCR kombinacija; Samostalni VCR; VCR s digitalnim prijemnikom; Ostalo
de: Videorecorder-Konfiguration: DVD/VCR-Kombination; Eigenständiger VCR; VCR mit Digitaltuner; Sonstiges
cs: Konfigurace videorekordéru: Kombinace DVD/VCR; Samostatný VCR; VCR s digitálním tunerem; Jiné
ru: Конфигурация видеомагнитофона: Комбинированный DVD/VCR; Автономный видеомагнитофон; Видеомагнитофон с цифровым тюнером; Другой
vi: Cấu hình VCR: Kết hợp DVD/VCR; VCR độc lập; VCR với bộ dò kỹ thuật số; Khác
ro-RO: Configurație VCR: Combo DVD/VCR; VCR independent; VCR cu tuner digital; Altele
da: VCR-konfiguration: DVD/VCR-kombi; Enkeltstående VCR; VCR med digital tuner; Andet
sl-SI: Konfiguracija videorekorderja: DVD/VCR kombinacija; Samostojni VCR; VCR z digitalnim tunerjем; Drugo
tr: VCR konfigürasyonu: DVD/VCR kombo; Bağımsız VCR; Dijital tunerli VCR; Diğer
es: Configuración del VCR: Combo DVD/VCR; VCR independiente; VCR con sintonizador digital; Otros
zh-TW: 錄影機配置: DVD/VCR 組合機; 獨立式 VCR; 含數位調諧器 VCR; 其他
sv: VCR-konfiguration: DVD/VCR-kombo; Fristående VCR; VCR med digital tuner; Övrigt
zh-CN: VCR 配置: DVD/录像机组合; 独立录像机; 带数字调谐器的录像机; 其他
sk-SK: Konfigurácia VCR: DVD/VCR kombinácia; Samostatný VCR; VCR s digitálnym tunerom; Iné
lt-LT: VCR konfigūracija: DVD/VCR kombinuotas; Atskiras VCR; VCR su skaitmeniniu imtuvu; Kita
ko: VCR 구성: DVD/VCR 콤보; 독립형 VCR; 디지털 튜너 내장 VCR; 기타
pt-PT: Configuração do videogravador: Combinação DVD/VCR; VCR autónomo; VCR com sintonizador digital; Outro
th: การกำหนดค่า VCR: ดีวีดี/วีซีอาร์รวมกัน; วีซีอาร์แบบแยกเดี่ยว; วีซีอาร์พร้อมจูนเนอร์ดิจิทัล; อื่นๆ
pl: Konfiguracja magnetowidu: Kombo DVD/VCR; Samodzielny VCR; VCR z tunerem cyfrowym; Inne